Colorado, session 2026A, SB090.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1502, add (1.4)
as follows:
6-1-1502. Definitions.
As used in this part 15, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.4) "CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN 42 U.S.C. SEC. 5195c (e).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1503, amend
(5)(m), (5)(o), and (5)(p); and add (5)(q) and (11) as follows:
6-1-1503. Manufacturer obligations regarding services -
exemptions - information technology equipment - critical
infrastructure determination by attorney general - rules.
(5) With respect to digital electronic equipment, this part 15 does
not apply to:
(m) Video game consoles; or
(o) Devices, components, or systems designed to perform or
facilitate quantum information processing, including, solely to the extent
necessary for such processing, storing, computing, communicating,
measuring, or sensing quantum information, through manipulation,
measurement, sensing, or utilization of quantum phenomena, limited to
instances where the phenomena are integral to the device's primary
function, including quantum superposition, quantum entanglement,
quantum interference, quantum tunneling, or quantum transduction; or
-2- 090

(p) Quantum sensing devices that exploit quantum phenomena,
limited to instances where the phenomena are integral to the device's
primary function, such as quantum coherence, quantum entanglement,
quantized energy states that do not include the semiconductor band gap
phenomenon, quantum squeezing, quantum superposition, quantum
interference, quantum transduction, or quantum tunneling, to detect,
measure, or monitor physical quantities, environmental parameters, or
external stimuli; OR
(q) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT THAT IS INTENDED TO
BE USED IN CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(11) OF THIS SECTION.
(11) (a) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES TO REVIEW
EXEMPTIONS FROM THIS PART 15 FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
EQUIPMENT THAT IS INTENDED TO BE USED IN CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE.
(b) IN REVIEWING AN EXEMPTION FROM THIS PART 15 PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (5)(q) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL
CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(I) WHETHER THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT IS
INTENDED TO BE USED IN A MANNER THAT WOULD QUALIFY THE
EQUIPMENT AS CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, AS DEFINED IN 42 U.S.C. SEC.
5195c (e); AND
(II) WHETHER THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT IS
SOLD TO ITS INTENDED CUSTOMERS UNDER A BUSINESS-TO-BUSINESS OR
BUSINESS-TO-GOVERNMENT CONTRACT AND NOT CUSTOMARILY SOLD IN
A RETAIL SETTING.
(c) THERE IS A PRESUMPTION THAT THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT IS EXEMPT DURING THE PENDENCY OF THE
-3- 090

ATTORNEY GENERAL'S REVIEW.
(d) A DETERMINATION MADE BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (11) MAY BE APPEALED BY THE
MANUFACTURER OF THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT IN A
DISTRICT COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 24-4-106.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- 090